District of Columbia statutes.
11-706

Absence, disability, or disqualification of judges; vacancies; quorum.

(a)

When the chief judge of the court is absent or disabled, the chief judge’s duties shall devolve upon and be performed by such associate judge as the chief judge may designate in writing. In the event that the chief judge is (1) disqualified or suspended, or (2) unable or fails to make such a designation, the chief judge’s duties shall devolve upon and be performed by the associate judges of the court according to the seniority of their original commissions.

(b)

A chief judge whose term as chief judge has expired shall continue to serve until redesignated or until the chief judge’s successor has been designated. When there is a vacancy in the position of chief judge, the position shall be filled temporarily as provided in subsection (a).

(c)

Two judges shall constitute a quorum of a division of the court, and six judges shall constitute a quorum of the court sitting in banc.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 479, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
June 13, 1994, Pub. L. 103-266, §§ 1(b)(3), (4), 108 Stat. 713
This section is referenced in § 11-710 and § 11-745.
1981 Ed., § 11-706.
1973 Ed., § 11-706.